Utah statutes.
63G-13-203.   Collaboration on integration of immigrants.

(1)  Consistent with the state plan described in Subsection 63G-13-202(1)(c), the commission shall:

(a)  work collaboratively with federal, state, and local governments to facilitate integration of immigrants in the state; and

(b)  work collaboratively with businesses and community organizations to ensure that public input into the process is consistently maintained with regard to integration of immigrants.

(2)  The commission shall evaluate the structure and organization of government in Utah including state agencies, independent entities, political subdivisions, and school districts, and advise the Legislature and governor on how best to achieve immigrant integration in the delivery of services and programs in a cost neutral manner.

(3)  In its examination of immigrant integration in the state, the commission shall identify any measures that will bring enhanced lawfulness, economy, efficiency, and accountability to government operations.

